Illinois, session 104th, HB3210.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Salary and Annuity Withholding Act is 5amended by changing Section 4 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 365/4)  (from Ch. 127, par. 354)7    Sec. 4. Authorization of withholding. An employee or 8annuitant may authorize the withholding of a portion of his 9salary, wages, or annuity for any one or more of the following 10purposes:11        (1) for purchase of United States Savings Bonds;12        (2) for payment of premiums on life or accident and 13    health insurance as defined in Section 4 of the "Illinois 14    Insurance Code", approved June 29, 1937, as amended, and 15    for payment of premiums on policies of automobile 16    insurance as defined in Section 143.13 of the "Illinois 17    Insurance Code", as amended, and the personal multiperil 18    coverages commonly known as homeowner's insurance. 19    However, no portion of salaries, wages or annuities may be 20    withheld to pay premiums on automobile, homeowner's, life 21    or accident and health insurance policies issued by any 22    one insurance company or insurance service company unless 23    a minimum of 100 employees or annuitants insured by that   HB3210- 2 -LRB104 08329 BDA 18380 b1    company authorize the withholding by an Office within 6 2    months after such withholding begins. If such minimum is 3    not satisfied the Office may discontinue withholding for 4    such company. For any insurance company or insurance 5    service company which has not previously had withholding, 6    the Office may allow withholding for premiums, where less 7    than 100 policies have been written, to cover a 8    probationary period. An insurance company which has 9    discontinued withholding may reinstate it upon 10    presentation of facts indicating new management or 11    re-organization satisfactory to the Office;12        (3) for payment to any labor organization designated 13    by the employee;14        (4) for payment of dues to any association the 15    membership of which consists of State employees and former 16    State employees;17        (5) for deposit in any credit union, in which State 18    employees are within the field of membership as a result 19    of their employment;20        (6) for payment to or for the benefit of an 21    institution of higher education by an employee of that 22    institution;23        (7) for payment of parking fees at the parking 24    facilities located on the Urbana-Champaign campus of the 25    University of Illinois;26        (8) for voluntary payment to the State of Illinois of   HB3210- 3 -LRB104 08329 BDA 18380 b1    amounts then due and payable to the State;2        (9) for investment purchases made as a participant or 3    contributor to qualified tuition programs established 4    pursuant to Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code or 5    qualified ABLE programs established pursuant to Section 6    529A of the Internal Revenue Code;7        (10) for voluntary payment to the Illinois Department 8    of Revenue of amounts due or to become due under the 9    Illinois Income Tax Act;10        (11) for payment of optional contributions to a 11    retirement system subject to the provisions of the 12    Illinois Pension Code;13        (12) for contributions to organizations found 14    qualified by the State Comptroller under the requirements 15    set forth in the Voluntary Payroll Deductions Act of 1983;16        (13) for payment of fringe benefit contributions to 17    employee benefit trust funds (whether such employee 18    benefit trust funds are governed by the Employee 19    Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended, 29 20    U.S.C. §1001 et seq. or not) for State contractual 21    employees hired through labor organizations and working 22    pursuant to a signed agreement between a labor 23    organization and a State agency, whether subject to the 24    Illinois Prevailing Wage Act or not; this item (13) is not 25    intended to limit employee benefit trust funds and the 26    contributions to be made thereto to be limited to those   HB3210- 4 -LRB104 08329 BDA 18380 b1    which are encompassed for purposes of computing the 2    prevailing wage in any particular locale, but rather such 3    employee benefit trusts are intended to include 4    contributions to be made to such funds that are intended 5    to assist in training, building and maintenance, industry 6    advancement, and the like, including but not limited to 7    those benefit trust funds such as pension and welfare that 8    are normally computed in the prevailing wage rates and 9    which otherwise would be subject to contribution 10    obligations by private employers that are signatory to 11    agreements with labor organizations;12        (14) for voluntary payment as part of the Illinois 13    Gives Initiative under Section 26 of the State Comptroller 14    Act; or 15        (15) for payment of parking fees at the underground 16    facility located at the intersection of South Spring 17    Street and West Edwards Street south of the William G. 18    Stratton State Office Building in Springfield or the 19    parking ramp located at 401 South College Street, west of 20    the William G. Stratton State Office Building in 21    Springfield. 22(Source: P.A. 99-166, eff. 7-28-15; 100-763, eff. 8-10-18.) 23    Section 10. The Secretary of State Act is amended by 24changing Section 12 as follows:   HB3210- 5 -LRB104 08329 BDA 18380 b1    (15 ILCS 305/12)  (from Ch. 124, par. 10.2)2    Sec. 12. Parking fees; leases. 3    (a) The Secretary of State shall impose a fee of $20 per 4month payable by all State employees parking vehicles in the 5underground parking facility located at the intersection of 6South Spring Street and West Edwards Street south of the 7William G. Stratton State Office Building in Springfield and 8the parking ramp located at 401 South College Street located 9west of the William G. Stratton State Office Building in 10Springfield, unless a non-State employee requests a space 11located in either garage, in which case the Secretary shall 12set the fee by rule. Except as otherwise provided in this 13Section, State officers and employees who make application for 14and are allotted parking places in such parking facilities 15shall authorize the Comptroller to deduct the required fees 16from their payroll checks under the State Salary and Annuity 17Withholding Act and the amounts so withheld shall be deposited 18as provided in Section 8 of that Act. Until December 31, 2024, 19members and employees of the General Assembly who make 20application for and are allotted parking places in such 21parking facilities may, alternatively, upon application by the 22Secretary of the Senate or the Clerk of the House of 23Representatives, have their parking fee paid by the General 24Assembly. The amounts paid in this instance would also be 25deposited as provided in Section 8 of the State Salary and 26Annuity Withholding Act. The President of the Senate and the   HB3210- 6 -LRB104 08329 BDA 18380 b1Speaker of the House of Representatives may authorize payment 2of the fees from appropriations made to the General Assembly. 3Persons who are not subject to the State Salary and Annuity 4Withholding Act and who are allotted parking places under this 5Section shall pay the required fees directly to the Office of 6the Secretary of State and the amounts so collected shall be 7deposited in the State Parking Facility Maintenance Fund in 8the State Treasury.9    (b) The Secretary of State may enter into agreements with 10public or private entities or individuals to lease to those 11entities or individuals parking spaces at State-owned 12Secretary of State facilities. Such agreements may be executed 13only upon a determination by the Secretary that leasing the 14parking spaces will not adversely impact the delivery of 15services to the public. The fee to be charged to the entity or 16individual leasing the parking spaces shall be established by 17rule. All funds collected by the Secretary pursuant to such 18leases shall be deposited in the State Parking Facility 19Maintenance Fund and shall be used for the maintenance and 20repair of parking lots at State-owned Secretary of State 21facilities. 22(Source: P.A. 102-678, eff. 12-10-21.) 23    Section 15. The Legislative Commission Reorganization Act 24of 1984 is amended by changing Section 8A-15 as follows:   HB3210- 7 -LRB104 08329 BDA 18380 b1    (25 ILCS 130/8A-15)2    Sec. 8A-15. Master plan.3    (a) The term "legislative complex" means (i) the buildings 4and facilities located in Springfield, Illinois, and occupied 5in whole or in part by the General Assembly or any of its 6support service agencies, (ii) the grounds, walkways, and 7pedestrian or utility tunnels surrounding or connected to 8those buildings and facilities, and (iii) the off-street 9parking areas serving those buildings and facilities, 10including parking lots D, DD, E, F, G, H, O, M, N, R, S, and 11the underground legislative parking garage located at 301 12South College Street in Springfield under parking lot O. 13    (b) The Architect of the Capitol shall prepare and 14implement a long-range master plan of development for the 15State Capitol Building, the remaining portions of the 16legislative complex, and the land and State buildings and 17facilities within the area bounded by Washington, Third, Cook, 18and Walnut Streets and the land and State buildings and 19facilities within the area bounded by Madison, Klein, Mason, 20and Rutledge Streets that addresses the improvement, 21construction, historic preservation, restoration, 22maintenance, repair, and landscaping needs of these State 23buildings and facilities and the land. The Architect of the 24Capitol shall submit the master plan to the Capitol Historic 25Preservation Board for its review and comment. The Board must 26confine its review and comment to those portions of the master   HB3210- 8 -LRB104 08329 BDA 18380 b1plan that relate to areas other than the State Capitol 2Building. The Architect may incorporate suggestions of the 3Board into the master plan. The master plan must be submitted 4to and approved by the Board of the Office of the Architect of 5the Capitol before its implementation. 6    The Architect of the Capitol may change the master plan 7and shall submit changes in the master plan that relate to 8areas other than the State Capitol Building to the Capitol 9Historic Preservation Board for its review and comment. All 10changes in the master plan must be submitted to and approved by 11the Board of the Office of the Architect of the Capitol before 12implementation. 13    (c) The Architect of the Capitol must review the master 14plan every 5 years or at the direction of the Board of the 15Office of the Architect of the Capitol. Changes in the master 16plan resulting from this review must be made in accordance 17with the procedure provided in subsection (b).18    (d) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the 19Architect of the Capitol has the sole authority to contract 20for all materials and services necessary for the 21implementation of the master plan. The Architect (i) may 22comply with the procedures established by the Joint Committee 23on Legislative Support Services under Section 1-4 or (ii) upon 24approval of the Board of the Office of the Architect of the 25Capitol, may, but is not required to, comply with a portion or 26all of the Illinois Procurement Code when entering into   HB3210- 9 -LRB104 08329 BDA 18380 b1contracts under this subsection. The Architect's compliance 2with the Illinois Procurement Code shall not be construed to 3subject the Architect or any other entity of the legislative 4branch to the Illinois Procurement Code with respect to any 5other contract.6    The Architect may enter into agreements with other State 7agencies for the provision of materials or performance of 8services necessary for the implementation of the master plan.9    State officers and agencies providing normal, day-to-day 10repair, maintenance, or landscaping or providing security, 11commissary, utility, parking, banking, tour guide, event 12scheduling, or other operational services for buildings and 13facilities within the legislative complex immediately prior to 14the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 93rd General 15Assembly shall continue to provide that normal, day-to-day 16repair, maintenance, or landscaping or those services on the 17same basis, whether by contract or employees, that the repair, 18maintenance, landscaping, or services were provided 19immediately prior to the effective date of this amendatory Act 20of the 93rd General Assembly, subject to the provisions of the 21master plan and with the approval of or as otherwise directed 22by the Architect of the Capitol.23    (e) The Architect of the Capitol shall monitor and approve 24all construction, preservation, restoration, maintenance, 25repair, and landscaping work in the legislative complex and 26implementation of the master plan, as well as activities that   HB3210- 10 -LRB104 08329 BDA 18380 b1alter the historic integrity of the legislative complex and 2the other land and State buildings and facilities in the 3master plan. 4    (f) The Architect of the Capitol shall be given notice of 5any bid for or contract of services related to the legislative 6complex. Prior to final execution of any contract for 7services, the Architect of the Capitol shall be given an 8opportunity to review and approve the contract and give any 9necessary input. As used in this subsection, "services" means 10any maintenance, removal of refuse, or delivery of utilities 11to the legislative complex. 12(Source: P.A. 102-699, eff. 4-19-22.)